Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1334
Sale, construed.

The requiring or taking of any deposit for any purpose upon such receptacle shall not be deemed nor held to be a sale, either optional or otherwise, in any proceeding under sections 28-1329 to 28-1334.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 318.